Utah statutes.
78B-14-314.   Limited immunity of petitioner.

(1)  Participation by a petitioner in a proceeding under this chapter before a responding tribunal, whether in person, by private attorney, or through services provided by the support-enforcement agency, does not confer personal jurisdiction over the petitioner in another proceeding.

(2)  A petitioner is not amenable to service of civil process while physically present in this state to participate in a proceeding under this chapter.

(3)  The immunity granted by this section does not extend to civil litigation based on acts unrelated to a proceeding under this chapter committed by a party while present in this state to participate in the proceeding.

